Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 1 General Provisions

8-3-1.
Short title.

This article may be referred to as the “Housing Authorities Law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 1.

8-3-2.
Legislative findings and declaration of necessity.

It is declared that there exist in the state unsanitary and unsafe dwelling accommodations; that persons of low income are forced to reside in such accommodations; that within the state there is a shortage of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations available at rents which persons of low income can afford and that such persons are therefore forced to occupy overcrowded and congested dwelling accommodations; that the aforesaid conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of the state and impair economic values; that these conditions necessitate excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for crime prevention and punishment, public health and safety, fire and accident protection and other public services and facilities; that these distressed areas cannot be cleared, nor can the shortage of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons of low income be relieved, solely through the operation of private enterprise, and that the construction of housing projects for persons of low income, as such persons are defined in Code Section 8-3-3, would therefore not be competitive with private enterprise; that the clearance, replanning, and reconstruction of the areas in which unsanitary or unsafe housing conditions exist and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired; and that it is in the public interest that work on such projects be commenced as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency. The necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted in this article is declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1417, § 1.

8-3-3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Area of operation,” in the case of a housing authority of a city, means such city and any area which lies within the territorial boundaries of any other city, provided that a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such other city declaring that there is a need for the city housing authority to exercise its powers within the territorial boundaries of said other city. No city, county, regional, or consolidated authority shall operate in any area in which an authority already established is operating without the consent by resolution of the authority already operating therein.

“Authority” or “housing authority” means any of the public corporations created by or pursuant to this article or any amendments thereto.

“Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued by an authority pursuant to this article.

“City” means any city in the state. “The city” means the particular city for which a particular housing authority is created.

“Clerk” means the clerk of the city or the clerk of the county, as the case may be, or the officer charged with the duties customarily imposed on such clerk.

“County” means any county in the state. “The county” means the particular county for which a particular housing authority is created.

“Dormitory housing project” means the construction, acquisition, remodeling, or improving of, or the adding to, any facility for use in connection with the housing of students at any member institution of the University System of Georgia.

“Federal government” means the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Governing body” means, in the case of a city, the council, commission, board of aldermen, or other legislative body of the city, and, in the case of a county, the judge of the probate court, the county commissioners, or other legislative body of the county.

“Housing project” means:

Any work or undertaking:

To demolish, clear, or remove buildings from any slum area, including the adaptation of such area to public purposes such as parks or other recreational or community purposes;

To provide decent, safe, and sanitary urban or rural dwellings, apartments, or other living accommodations for persons of low income, including the providing of buildings, land, equipment, facilities, and other real or personal property for necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances, streets, sewers, water service, parks, site preparation, or gardening or for administrative, community, health, recreational, educational, welfare, or other purposes; provided, however, that a project which is or is expected to be subject to a private enterprise agreement shall qualify as a “housing project” within the meaning of this article if at least 20 percent of the project is occupied by persons of low income; or

To accomplish a combination of the foregoing; and

The planning of the buildings and improvements; the acquisition of property; the demolition of existing structures; the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair of the improvements; and all other work in connection therewith.

“Mayor” means the mayor of the city or the officer thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the mayor.

“Obligee of the authority” or “obligee” means any bondholder, or the trustee or trustees for any bondholders; any lessor demising to the authority property used in connection with a housing project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest or any part thereof; and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the authority.

“Persons of low income” means persons or families who lack the income necessary (as determined by the authority undertaking the housing project) to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings without overcrowding.

(13.1)

“Private enterprise agreement” means a contract between a housing authority and a person or entity operating for profit for:

The management of a housing project;

The development of and the provision of credit enhancement with respect to a housing project;

The ownership or operation of a housing project by the for profit entity in which the housing authority participates, either directly or indirectly through a wholly owned subsidiary, for purposes of facilitating the development, provision of credit enhancement, operation, or management of such housing project in accordance with this article. Such participation may involve ownership by the housing authority of an interest in the housing project through the for profit entity, ownership by the housing authority of the land on which the housing project is developed, or provision by the housing authority of a combination of funds to the for profit entity for a portion of the construction costs of the housing project and funds to the for profit entity to subsidize the operating costs of units for persons of low income to the extent such contract is designated as a private enterprise agreement by the housing authority; or

Any combination of any of the foregoing.

“Real property” means all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest, and right, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such liens.

“Slum” means any area comprised predominantly of dwellings which are detrimental to safety, health, and morals by reason of dilapidation; overcrowding; faulty arrangement or design; lack of ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities; or any combination of these factors.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 3; Ga. L. 1939, p. 112, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 219, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 65, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 283, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1417, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 203, § 1/HB 30; Ga. L. 2021, p. 448, § 1/SB 144.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in paragraph (1), in the first sentence, deleted “the area within ten miles of the territorial boundaries thereof but does not mean” following “such city and”, and substituted “city, provided that” for “city unless”.

8-3-3.1.
Additional definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Community facilities” means the land, buildings, improvements, and equipment for such recreational, community, educational, and commercial facilities as the authority determines improve the quality of an eligible housing unit.

“Eligible housing unit” means real and personal property located in the state constituting single or multifamily dwelling units suitable for occupancy by low and moderate income families and such community facilities as may be incidental or appurtenant thereto; provided, however, that all multifamily dwelling units located within an apartment complex shall qualify as “eligible housing units” if at least 20 percent of the multifamily dwelling units within the complex are occupied by or are held available for occupancy by low and moderate income families.

“Low and moderate income families” means persons and families of one or more persons, irrespective of race, creed, national origin, or sex determined by the authority to require such assistance as is made available by this article on account of insufficient personal or family income, taking into consideration, without limitation, such factors as:

The amount of total income of such persons and families available for housing needs;

The size of the families;

The cost and condition of housing facilities available;

The ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the normal private housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is providing sanitary, decent, and safe housing; and

If appropriate, standards established for various federal programs with respect to housing determining eligibility based on income of such persons and families.

“Mortgage lenders” means national banking associations, banks chartered under the laws of the state, savings and building and loan associations chartered under the laws of the state or of the United States of America, the Federal National Mortgage Association, and federal or state credit unions. The term shall also include mortgage bankers and other financial institutions or governmental agencies which are authorized to deal in mortgages insured or guaranteed by the federal government and other entities authorized to extend loans for single or multifamily housing under the laws of the state.

“Mortgage loans” means notes and other evidences of indebtedness secured by mortgages.

“Mortgaged property” means all properties, real, personal, and mixed, and all interests therein, including grants or subsidies with respect thereto, mortgaged, pledged, or otherwise provided in any manner as security for mortgage loans or loans to mortgage lenders.

“Mortgages” means security deeds, mortgages, deeds of trust, and other instruments granting security interests in real and personal properties constituting eligible housing units.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 2228, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-3-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2228, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 797, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Federal National Mortgage Association, referred to in paragraph (4), is provided for in

12 U.S.C. § 1716

et seq.

8-3-4.
Creation of housing authorities.

In each city and in each county of the state there is created a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “housing authority” of the city or county; provided, however, that such authority shall not transact any business or exercise its powers under this article until or unless the governing body of the city or the county, as the case may be, by proper resolution shall declare at any time hereafter that there is need for an authority to function in such city or county. The determination as to whether there is such need for an authority to function may be made by the governing body on its own motion or shall be made by the governing body upon the filing of a petition signed by 25 residents of the city or county, as the case may be, asserting that there is need for an authority to function in such city or county and requesting that the governing body so declare.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 4; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1.

8-3-5.
Findings required before adoption of resolution.

A governing body shall adopt a resolution declaring that there is need for a housing authority in the city or county, as the case may be, if it shall find that insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such city or county or that there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such city or county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford.

In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or insanitary, said governing body may take into consideration the degree of overcrowding; the percentage of land coverage; the light, air, space, and access available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations; the size and arrangement of the rooms; the sanitary facilities; and the extent to which conditions which endanger life or property by fire or other causes exist in such buildings.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 4.

8-3-6.
Resolution as conclusive evidence of authority’s establishment and authority.

In any action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or otherwise relating to, any contract of an authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers under this article upon proof of the adoption of a resolution by the governing body declaring the need for the authority. Such resolution shall be deemed sufficient if it declares that there is need for an authority and finds in substantially such terms as appear in subsection (a) of Code Section 8-3-5, no further detail being necessary, that either or both of the conditions enumerated in that subsection exist in the city or county, as the case may be.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 4; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 7/HB 24.

Cross references.

Hearsay rule exceptions, §

24-8-803

.

Self authentication, §

24-9-902

.

Public records, §

24-10-1005

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment made by that Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

8-3-7.
Applicability of local laws, ordinances, and regulations to housing projects.

All housing projects of an authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws, ordinances, and regulations applicable to the locality in which the housing project is situated.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 13.

8-3-8.
Exemption of authorities and their property from taxes and special assessments; payments in lieu of taxes and special assessments.

The property of an authority is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and not for purposes of private or corporate benefit and income. That portion of any housing project subject to a private enterprise agreement contemplated by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (13.1) of Code Section 8-3-3 consisting of the eligible housing units therein that are occupied or reserved for occupancy by persons of low income is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and not for purposes of private or corporate benefit or income. Therefore, an authority and its property, as well as only that portion of any housing project subject to a private enterprise agreement contemplated by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (13.1) of Code Section 8-3-3 consisting of the eligible housing units therein that are occupied or reserved for occupancy by persons of low income, shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the city, the county, and the state or any political subdivision thereof, provided that, in lieu of such taxes or special assessments, an authority may agree to make payments to the city or the county or any such political subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by such city, county, or political subdivision for the benefit of a housing project; but in no event shall such payments exceed the estimated cost to such city, county, or political subdivision of the improvements, services, or facilities to be so furnished.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 21; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1417, § 3.

8-3-9.
Filing reports with clerk; recommending legislation or other necessary action.

At least once a year, an authority shall file with the clerk a report of its activities for the preceding year and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 22.

8-3-10.
Vesting of fee simple title upon an authority’s exercise of power of eminent domain.

Whenever a housing authority is or has been created under the terms of this article, and whenever it is determined by the commissioners or other governing body of such authority to be necessary or advisable to exercise the power of eminent domain by condemning property, and whenever such condemnation proceedings are instituted and carried on under Chapter 2 of Title 22 or through any other method of condemnation provided by law, then upon the payment by such authority seeking condemnation of the amount of the award, or the amount of the final judgment on appeal, such authority shall become vested with a fee simple indefeasible title to the property to which such condemnation proceedings relate. It is declared to be necessary in order to enable such authorities to exercise their franchise that, upon such condemnation proceedings being had, such housing authorities shall become vested with fee simple indefeasible title to the property involved in such proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 112, § 7.

8-3-11.
Renting of housing units — Requirements as to fixing of rentals by authorities generally.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that each housing authority shall manage and operate its housing projects or, in the event of its use of a private enterprise agreement, shall cause each housing project subject thereto to be managed and operated in an efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals for dwelling accommodations for persons of low income at the lowest possible rates consistent with its providing decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and that no housing authority shall construct or operate the dwelling accommodations in any such project that are occupied or reserved for occupancy by persons of low income for a profit or as a source of revenue to the city or the county. To this end, an authority shall fix the rentals for those dwelling accommodations in such housing projects that are occupied or reserved for occupancy by persons of low income at no higher rates than it shall find necessary in order to produce revenues which, together with all other available moneys, revenues, income, and receipts of the authority from whatever sources derived, will be sufficient:

To pay, as the same become due, the principal of and the interest on the bonds of the authority which from time to time are outstanding;

To meet the cost of maintaining and operating the eligible housing units in such projects that are used, occupied, or reserved for use or occupancy by persons of low income, including the cost of any insurance; to meet the administrative expenses of the authority; and to provide reasonable reserves for maintenance and operating expenses; and

To create and maintain such reasonable reserves as may be required in connection with the issuance of any bonds of the authority now outstanding or hereafter issued, and to create and maintain reasonable reserves for its future operations.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 9; Ga. L. 1959, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1417, § 4.

8-3-12.
Dwelling accommodations for persons of low income; duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection.

In the operation or management of housing projects, an authority shall at all times observe or cause to be observed the following duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection in those dwelling accommodations that are reserved for occupancy by persons of low income:

It may rent or lease such dwelling accommodations only to persons of low income;

It may rent or lease such dwelling accommodations only at rentals within the financial reach of such persons of low income;

It may rent or lease such dwelling accommodations consisting of the number of rooms (but no greater number) which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed low-income occupants thereof without overcrowding;

It shall not accept any person as a tenant in such dwelling accommodations if the person or persons who would occupy the dwelling accommodations have, at the time of admission, an aggregate annual net income, less an exemption of $100.00 for each minor member of the family other than the head of the family and his or her spouse, in excess of five times the annual rental of the dwelling accommodation to be furnished such person or persons. In computing the rental for this purpose of selecting tenants, there shall be included in the rental the average annual cost to the occupants, as determined by the authority, of heat, water, electricity, gas, cooking range, and other necessary services or facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is in fact included in the rental; and

It shall prohibit subletting by low-income tenants.

Nothing contained in this Code section or Code Section 8-3-11 shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority to vest in an obligee the right, in the event of a default by the authority or by any for profit entity in which the authority participates, directly or indirectly, through a private enterprise agreement, to take possession of a housing project or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof or acquire title thereto through foreclosure proceedings, free from all the restrictions imposed by this Code section or Code Section 8-3-11, provided that an authority may agree to conditions as to tenant eligibility or preference required by the federal government pursuant to federal law in any contract for financial assistance with the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 10; Ga. L. 1939, p. 112, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 219, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1417, § 5.

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain public housing or reduction in public housing rent, §

16-9-55

.

8-3-13.
Cooperation and joint operation by authorities.

Any two or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise, either jointly or otherwise, of any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing (including the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations and giving security therefor), planning, undertaking, owning, constructing, operating, or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects located within the area of operation of any one or more of said authorities. For such purpose, an authority may by resolution prescribe and authorize any other housing authority or authorities, so joining or cooperating with it, to act on its behalf with respect to any or all powers. For purposes of this Code section the term “authorities” shall include an urban residential finance authority created pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 41 of Title 36.

Any authorities joining or cooperating with one another may by resolution appoint from among the commissioners of such authorities an executive committee with full power to act on behalf of such authorities with respect to any or all of their powers, as prescribed by resolutions of such authorities.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 11; Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 8; Ga. L. 1988, p. 901, § 1.

8-3-14.
Consolidated housing authorities for two or more municipalities.

As used in this Code section, the term “municipality” means any municipality in this state.

If the governing body of each of two or more municipalities by resolution declares that there is a need for one housing authority for all of such municipalities to exercise in such municipalities the powers and other functions prescribed for a housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a consolidated housing authority, which may be an existing housing authority designated by the municipalities as the consolidated housing authority or a new housing authority, with such corporate name as it selects, shall thereupon exist for all of such municipalities and exercise its powers and other functions within its area of operation as defined in this article, including the power to undertake projects therein. Upon the creation of a consolidated housing authority, any housing authority created for any of such municipalities, other than an existing housing authority designated as the consolidated housing authority, shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed of its real property to the consolidated housing authority.

The creation of a consolidated housing authority and the finding of need therefor shall be subject to the same provisions and limitations as are applicable to the creation of a regional housing authority; and all of the provisions of this article applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof shall be applicable to consolidated housing authorities and the commissioners thereof; provided, however, that Code Section 8-3-107 shall not be applicable to the consolidation of housing authorities into a designated existing housing authority; and provided, further, that the area of operation of a consolidated housing authority shall include all of the territory within the boundaries of each municipality joining in the creation of such authority; and provided, further, that for all such purposes, the term “county” shall be construed as meaning “municipality,” the term “governing body” in Code Section 8-3-106 shall be construed as meaning “mayor or other executive head of the municipality,” and the terms “county housing authority” and “regional housing authority” shall be construed as meaning “housing authority of the city” and “consolidated housing authority,” respectively.

The governing body of a municipality for which a housing authority has not been created may adopt the resolution provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section if it first declares that there is a need for a housing authority to function in said municipality, which declaration shall be made in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as the declaration of the governing body of a city required by Code Sections 8-3-4 through 8-3-6 for the purpose of authorizing a housing authority created for a city to transact business and exercise its powers.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a consolidated housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such consolidated housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities, and limitations as those provided for housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities, in the same manner as though all the provisions of law applicable to housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties were applicable to consolidated housing authorities.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 2007, p. 203, § 2/HB 30; Ga. L. 2021, p. 448, § 2/SB 144.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “together with the territory within ten miles of the boundaries of each such municipality” following “creation of such authority” at the end of the second proviso of subsection (c).

8-3-15.
Extraterritorial operation of city housing authorities.

In addition to its other powers, a housing authority created for a city may exercise any or all of its powers within the territorial boundaries of any other municipality not included in the area of operation of such housing authority for the purpose of planning, undertaking, financing, constructing, and operating a housing project or projects within such municipality, provided that a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such municipality in which the authority is to exercise its powers, and by any housing authority theretofore established by such municipality and authorized to exercise its powers therein declaring that there is a need for the housing authority seeking to exercise extraterritorial powers so to exercise its powers within such municipality.

No governing body of a city or other municipality shall adopt such resolution unless it shall have found in substantially the following terms:

That insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such municipality or that there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such municipality available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and

That these conditions can be best remedied through the exercise of the aforesaid city housing authority’s powers within the territorial boundaries of such municipality.

Any such findings made pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall not have the effect of establishing a housing authority for any such municipality under this article nor of thereafter preventing such municipality from establishing a housing authority or joining in the creation of a consolidated housing authority.

During the time that, pursuant to any findings made pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, a housing authority has outstanding, or is under contract to issue, any evidences of indebtedness for a project within the city or other municipality, no other housing authority may undertake a project within such municipality without the consent of said housing authority which has such outstanding indebtedness or obligation.

A municipality shall have the same powers to furnish financial and other assistance to a housing authority exercising its powers within such municipality under this Code section as though the municipality were within the area of operation of such authority.

Any city housing authority operating housing projects that are outside such city and within ten miles of the boundaries of such city on July 1, 2021, shall be entitled to continue to operate such extraterritorial housing projects; provided, however, that no new housing projects outside such city shall be authorized without the governing body of the county or municipality where such housing project will be located consenting to the expansion of the housing authority’s area of operation into such county or other municipality. Any such project shall conform to existing zoning classifications and land use plans of the political subdivision in which the proposed project will be located.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 2021, p. 448, § 3/SB 144.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (f).

8-3-16.
Providing housing in rural areas.

Any housing authority which has rural areas under its jurisdiction may undertake the provision of housing for families of low income in such rural areas and may comply with any conditions not inconsistent with the purposes of this article required by the federal government pursuant to federal law in any contract for financial assistance with the authority concerning such undertakings.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1945, p. 270, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 219, § 2.